Utah statutes.
10-9a-522.   Refineries.

(1)  As used in this section, "develop" or "development" means:

(a)  the construction, alteration, or improvement of land, including any related moving, demolition, or excavation outside of a refinery property boundary;

(b)  the subdivision of land for a non-industrial use; or

(c)  the construction of a non-industrial structure on a parcel that is not subject to the subdivision process.

(2)  Before a legislative body may adopt a non-industrial zoning change to permit development within 500 feet of a refinery boundary, the legislative body shall consult with the refinery to determine whether the proposed change is compatible with the refinery.

(3)  Before a land use authority may approve an application to develop within 500 feet of a refinery boundary, the land use authority shall consult with the refinery to determine whether the development is compatible with the refinery.

(4)  A legislative body described in Subsection (2), or a land use authority described in Subsection (3), may not request from the refinery:

(a)  proprietary information;

(b)  information, if made public, that would create a security or safety risk to the refinery or the public;

(c)  information that is restricted from public disclosure under federal or state law; or

(d)  information that is available in public record.

(5) (a)  This section does not grant authority to a legislative body described in Subsection (2), or a land use authority described in Subsection (3), to require a refinery to undertake or cease an action.

(b)  This section does not create a cause of action against a refinery.

(c)  Except as expressly provided in this section, this section does not alter or remove any legal right or obligation of a refinery.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 2010 General Session

